Hawaii statutes.
§377-3 Conciliator. In the event the
board receives information that a labor dispute exists and determines that the
dispute is within its jurisdiction and that the possibility of settlement and
termination of the dispute may be increased by conciliation, the board shall so
notify the governor.

Upon receipt of the notice, the governor shall
appoint, as conciliator with respect to the dispute, a person who is well-known
in the community as being impartial to both labor and industry, and shall so
notify the board. The position of conciliator shall not be subject to chapters
76 and 89.

Upon receipt of notice of the appointment of a
conciliator, the board shall forthwith refer the dispute to the conciliator.
The conciliator shall use the conciliator's best efforts to terminate the
dispute by conciliation within the ten days immediately succeeding the
reference of the dispute to the conciliator or within such additional time, not
to exceed ten days, as is agreed upon by all parties to the dispute. If, within
the ten days, or the additional time, if any, the conciliator succeeds in
terminating the dispute by conciliation, the conciliator shall immediately
certify such fact to the board and the conciliator's appointment shall then
end. If, within the ten days, or the additional time, if any, the conciliator
fails to terminate the dispute by conciliation, the conciliator shall
immediately certify such fact to the board and the conciliator's appointment
shall then end. Upon the termination of the appointment of the conciliator,
the board shall so notify the governor. [L 1945, c 250, §5; am L 1951, c 249,
§2; RL 1955, §90-4; HRS §377-3; am L 1985, c 251, §14; gen ch 1985; am L 2002,
c 148, §42]

Cross References

Appointment of mediator, §371-10.

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next